Hawaii statutes.
§394-5 Administration. The department
of labor and industrial relations is authorized, with the advice of the
workforce development council, to plan and administer human resource
development and training programs under this chapter. The department shall
process the payment of weekly compensation as provided under this chapter. [L
1969, c 251, §5; am L 1971, c 188, §5; am L 1986, c 339, §63; am L 1993, c 6,
§16; am L 1997, c 346, §9]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next